North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-19.1 North Dakota Business Corporation Act
10-19.1-88.
Procedures for asserting dissenters’ rights.

For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subsection have the meanings given them.

“Corporation” means the issuer of the shares held by a dissenter before the corporate action referred to in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-87 or the successor by merger of that issuer.

“Fair value of the shares” means the value of the shares of a corporation immediately before the effective date of a corporate action referred to in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-87.

“Interest” means interest commencing five days after the effective date of the corporate action referred to in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-87, up to and including the date of payment, calculated at the rate provided in section 28-20-34 for interest on verdicts and judgments.

If a corporation calls a shareholder meeting at which any action described in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-87 is to be voted upon, the notice of the meeting shall inform each shareholder of the right to dissent and shall include a copy of section 10-19.1-87 and this section.

If the proposed action must be approved by the shareholders, and the corporation calls a meeting of shareholders, then a shareholder who is entitled to dissent under section 10-19.1-87 and who wishes to exercise dissenter’s rights shall file with the corporation before the vote on the proposed action a written notice of intent to demand the fair value of the shares owned by the shareholder and may not vote the shares in favor of the proposed action.

After the proposed action has been approved by the board and, if necessary, the shareholders, the corporation shall send to all shareholders who have complied with subsection 3, to all shareholders who did not sign or consent to a written action that gave effect to the action creating the right to obtain payment under section 10-19.1-87, and to all shareholders entitled to dissent if no shareholder vote was required, a notice that contains:

The address to which a demand for payment and share certificates must be sent in order to obtain payment and the date by which they must be received;

A form to be used to certify the date on which the shareholder, or the beneficial owner on whose behalf the shareholder dissents, acquired the shares or an interest in them and to demand payment; and

A copy of section 10-19.1-87 and this section.

In order to receive the fair value of shares, a dissenting shareholder must demand payment and deposit certificated shares within thirty days after the notice required by subsection 4 was given, but the dissenter retains all other rights of a shareholder until the proposed action takes effect.

After the corporate action takes effect, or after the corporation receives a valid demand for payment, whichever is later, the corporation shall remit, to each dissenting shareholder who has complied with subsections 3, 4, and 5, the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of the shares, plus interest, accompanied by:

The corporation’s closing balance sheet and statement of income for a fiscal year ending not more than sixteen months before the effective date of the corporate action, together with the latest available interim financial statements;

An estimate by the corporation of the fair value of the shares and a brief description of the method used to reach the estimate; and

A copy of section 10-19.1-87 and this section.

The corporation may withhold the remittance described in subsection 6 from a person who was not a shareholder on the date the action dissented from was first announced to the public or who is dissenting on behalf of a person who was not a beneficial owner on that date. If the dissenter has complied with subsections 3, 4, and 5, the corporation shall forward to the dissenter the materials described in subsection 6, a statement of the reason for withholding the remittance, and an offer to pay to the dissenter the amount listed in the materials if the dissenter agrees to accept the amount in full satisfaction. The dissenter may decline the offer and demand payment under subsection 9. Failure to do so entitles the dissenter only to the amount offered. If the dissenter makes demand, subsections 10 and 11 apply.

If the corporation fails to remit within sixty days of the deposit of certificates, it shall return all deposited certificates. However, the corporation may again give notice under subsections 4 and 5 and require deposit at a later time.

If a dissenter believes that the amount remitted under subsections 6, 7, and 8 is less than the fair value of the shares plus interest, the dissenter may give written notice to the corporation of the dissenter’s own estimate of the fair value of the shares plus interest, within thirty days after the corporation mails the remittance under subsections 6, 7, and 8, and demand payment of the difference. Otherwise, a dissenter is entitled only to the amount remitted by the corporation.

If the corporation receives a demand under subsection 9, it shall, within sixty days after receiving the demand, either pay to the dissenter the amount demanded or agreed to by the dissenter after a discussion with the corporation or file in court a petition requesting that the court determine the fair value of the shares plus interest. The petition shall be filed in the county in which the registered office of the corporation is located, except that a surviving foreign corporation that receives a demand relating to the shares of a constituent corporation shall file the petition in the county in this state in which the last registered office of the constituent corporation was located. The petition shall name as parties all dissenters who have demanded payment under subsection 9 and who have not reached agreement with the corporation. The corporation, after filing the petition, shall serve all parties with a summons and copy of the petition under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure. The residents of this state may be served by registered mail or by publication as provided by law. Except as otherwise provided, the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure apply to the proceeding. The jurisdiction of the court is plenary and exclusive. The court may appoint appraisers, with powers and authorities the court deems proper, to receive evidence on and recommend the amount of the fair value of the shares. The court shall determine whether the shareholder or other shareholders in question have fully complied with the requirements of this section, and shall determine the fair value of the shares, taking into account any and all factors the court finds relevant, computed by any method or combination of methods that the court, in its discretion, sees fit to use, whether or not used by the corporation or by a dissenter. The fair value of the shares as determined by the court is binding on all shareholders, wherever located. A dissenter is entitled to judgment for the amount by which the fair value of the shares as determined by the court, plus interest, exceeds the amount, if any, remitted under subsections 6, 7, and 8, but shall not be liable to the corporation for the amount, if any, by which the amount, if any, remitted to the dissenter under subsections 6, 7, and 8 exceeds the fair value of the shares as determined by the court, plus interest.

The court shall determine the costs and expenses of a proceeding under subsection 10, including the reasonable expenses in compensation of any appraisers appointed by the court, and shall assess those costs and expenses against the corporation, except that the court may assess part or all of those costs and expenses against a dissenter whose action in demanding payment under subsection 9 is found to be arbitrary, vexatious, or not in good faith.

If the court finds that the corporation has failed to comply substantially with this section, the court may assess all fees and expenses of any experts or attorneys as the court deems equitable. These fees and expenses may also be assessed against a person who has acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith in bringing the proceeding, and may be awarded to a party injured by those actions.

The court may award, in its discretion, fees and expenses to an attorney for the dissenters out of the amount awarded to the dissenters, if any.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 33; 1995, ch. 103, § 31; 1999, ch. 95, § 25; 2005, ch. 100, § 23.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-20-08, 10-20-11.

10-19.1-89.
Loans — Guarantees — Suretyship.

A corporation may lend money to, guarantee or pledge its assets as security for an obligation of, become a surety for, or otherwise financially assist any person, if the transaction, or a class of transactions to which the transaction belongs, is approved by the board and:

Is in the usual and regular course of business of the corporation;

Is with, or for the benefit of, a related organization, an organization in which the corporation has a financial interest, a person or organization with which the corporation has a business relationship in the usual and regular course of business, or an organization to which the corporation has the power to make donations;

Is with, or for the benefit of, an officer or director or other employee of the corporation or a related organization, and may reasonably be expected, in the judgment of the board, to benefit the corporation; or

Whether or not any separate consideration has been paid or promised to the corporation has been approved by:

The holders of two-thirds of the voting power of the shares entitled to vote which are owned by persons other than the interested person or persons; or

The unanimous affirmative vote of the holders of all outstanding shares, whether or not entitled to vote.

A loan, guarantee, surety contract, or other financial assistance under subsection 1 may be with or without interest and may be unsecured or may be secured in any manner, including a grant of a security interest in shares of the corporation.

This section does not grant any authority to act as a bank or to carry on the business of banking.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 34; 1995, ch. 103, § 32; 1997, ch. 103, § 52.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-04, 10-19-46, 10-19-47.

10-19.1-90.
Advances.

A corporation may, without a vote of the directors or its shareholders, advance money to its shareholders who provide services, directors, officers, or employees to cover expenses that can reasonably be anticipated to be incurred by them in the performance of their duties and for which they would be entitled to reimbursement in the absence of an advance.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 53.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-46.

10-19.1-91.
Indemnification.

For purposes of this section:

“Corporation” includes a domestic or foreign corporation that was the predecessor of the corporation referred to in this section in a merger or other transaction in which the predecessor’s existence ceased upon consummation of the transaction.

“Official capacity” means:

With respect to a director, the position of director in a corporation;

With respect to a person other than a director, the elective or appointive office or position held by an officer, member of a committee of the board, or the employment relationship undertaken by an employee of the corporation; and

With respect to a director, officer, or employee of the corporation who, while a director, officer, or employee of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation or whose duties in that position involve or involved service as a governor, director, officer, manager, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another organization or employee benefit plan, the position of that person as a governor, director, officer, manager, partner, trustee, employee, or agent, as the case may be, of the other organization or employee benefit plan.

“Proceeding” means a threatened, pending, or completed civil, criminal, administrative, arbitration, or investigative proceeding, including a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation.

“Special legal counsel” means counsel who has not in the preceding five years:

Represented the corporation or a related organization in any capacity other than special legal counsel; or

Represented a director, officer, member of a committee of the board, or employee whose indemnification is in issue.

Subject to subsection 5, a corporation shall indemnify a person made or threatened to be made a party to a proceeding by reason of the former or present official capacity of the person against judgments, penalties, fines including excise taxes assessed against the person with respect to an employee benefit plan, settlements, and reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by the person in connection with the proceeding, if, with respect to the acts or omissions of the person complained of in the proceeding, the person:

Has not been indemnified by another organization or employee benefit plan for the same judgments, penalties, fines including excise taxes assessed against the person with respect to an employee benefit plan, settlements, and reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by the person in connection with the proceeding with respect to the same acts or omissions;

Acted in good faith;

Received no improper personal benefit and section 10-19.1-51, if applicable, has been satisfied;

In the case of a criminal proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe the conduct was unlawful; and

In the case of acts or omissions occurring in the official capacity described in paragraph 1 or 2 of subdivision b of subsection 1, reasonably believed that the conduct was in the best interests of the corporation, or in the case of acts or omissions occurring in the official capacity described in paragraph 3 of subdivision b of subsection 1, reasonably believed that the conduct was not opposed to the best interests of the corporation. If the person’s acts or omissions complained of in the proceeding relate to conduct as a director, officer, trustee, employee, or agent of an employee benefit plan, the conduct is not considered to be opposed to the best interests of the corporation if the person reasonably believed that the conduct was in the best interests of the participants or beneficiaries of the employee benefit plan.

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of nolo contendere or an equivalent plea does not, of itself, establish that the person did not meet the criteria set forth in subsection 2.

Subject to subsection 5, if a person is made or threatened to be made a party to a proceeding, the person is entitled, upon written request to the corporation, to payment or reimbursement by the corporation of reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by the person in advance of the final disposition of the proceeding:

Upon receipt by the corporation of a written affirmation by the person of a good-faith belief that the criteria for indemnification set forth in subsection 2 have been satisfied and a written undertaking by the person to repay all amounts so paid or reimbursed by the corporation, if the ultimate determination is that the criteria for indemnification have not been satisfied; and

After a determination that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under this section.

The articles or bylaws may prohibit indemnification or advances of expenses otherwise required under this section or may impose conditions on indemnification or advances of expenses in addition to the conditions contained in subsections 2, 3, and 4, including monetary limits on indemnification or advances for expenses, if the prohibitions or conditions apply equally to all persons or to all persons within a given class. A prohibition or limit on indemnification or advances may not apply to or affect the right of a person to indemnification or advances of expenses with respect to any act or omission of the person occurring before the effective date of a provision in the articles or the date of adoption of a provision in the bylaws establishing the prohibition or limit on indemnification or advances.

This section does not require, or limit the ability of, a corporation to reimburse expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by a person in connection with an appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when the person has not been made or threatened to be made a party to a proceeding.

All determinations whether indemnification of a person is required because the criteria provided in subsection 2 have been satisfied and whether a person is entitled to payment or reimbursement of expenses in advance of the final disposition of a proceeding as provided in subsection 4 must be made:

By the board by a majority of a quorum, if the directors who are at the time parties to the proceeding are not counted for determining either a majority or the presence of a quorum;

If a quorum under subdivision a cannot be obtained, by a majority of a committee of the board, consisting solely of two or more directors not at the time parties to the proceeding, duly designated to act in the matter by a majority of the full board, including directors who are parties;

If a determination is not made under subdivision a or b, by special legal counsel, selected either by a majority of the board or a committee by vote pursuant to subdivision a or b or, if the requisite quorum of the full board cannot be obtained and the committee cannot be established, by a majority of the full board, including directors who are parties;

If a determination is not made under subdivisions a, b, and c, by the affirmative vote of the shareholders required by section 10-19.1-74, other than the shareholders who are a party to the proceeding; or

If an adverse determination is made under subdivisions a through d, or under subsection 8, or if no determination is made under subdivisions a through d, or under subsection 8, within sixty days after:

The later to occur of the termination of a proceeding or a written request for indemnification to the corporation; or

A request for an advance of expenses, as the case may be, by a court in this state, which may be the same court in which the proceeding involving the person’s liability took place, upon application of the person and any notice the court requires.

With respect to a person who is not, and who was not at the time of the acts or omissions complained of in the proceedings, a director, officer, or person possessing, directly or indirectly, the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of the corporation, the determination whether indemnification of this person is required because the criteria set forth in subsection 2 have been satisfied and whether this person is entitled to payment or reimbursement of expenses in advance of the final disposition of a proceeding as provided in subsection 4 may be made by an annually appointed committee of the board, having at least one member who is a director. The committee shall report at least annually to the board concerning its actions.

A corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a person in that person’s official capacity against any liability asserted against and incurred by the person in or arising from that capacity, whether or not the corporation would have been required to indemnify the person against the liability under the provisions of this section.

A corporation that indemnifies or advances expenses to a person in accordance with this section in connection with a proceeding by or on behalf of the corporation shall report to the shareholders in writing the amount of the indemnification or advance and to whom and on whose behalf the indemnification or advance was paid not later than the next meeting of shareholders.

This section does not limit the power of the corporation to indemnify persons other than a director, officer, employee, or member of a committee of the board by contract or otherwise.

The written undertaking required by subdivision a is an unlimited general obligation of the person making it, but need not be secured and shall be accepted without reference to financial ability to make the repayment.

The person seeking indemnification or payment or reimbursement of expenses pursuant to this subdivision has the burden of establishing that the person is entitled to indemnification or payment or reimbursement of expenses.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, §§ 35, 36; 1995, ch. 103, § 33; 1997, ch. 103, § 54; 1999, ch. 95, § 26; 2001, ch. 112, § 10; 2005, ch. 100, § 24; 2009, ch. 106, § 16.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-04.

Cross-References.

Indemnification by banking association, see N.D.C.C. § 6-03-02.1.

10-19.1-92.
Distributions.

The board may authorize and cause the corporation to make a distribution only if the board determines, in accordance with subsection 2, that the corporation will be able to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business after making the distribution and the board does not know before the distribution is made that the determination was or has become erroneous.

The corporation may make the distribution if it is able to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business after making the distribution.

The effect of a distribution on the ability of the corporation to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business after making the distribution must be measured in accordance with subsection 3.

The right of the board to authorize, and the corporation to make, distributions may be prohibited, limited, or restricted by, or the rights and priorities of persons to receive distributions may be established by, the articles or bylaws or an agreement.

A determination that the corporation will be able to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business after the distribution is presumed to be proper if the determination is made in compliance with the standard of conduct provided in section 10-19.1-50 on the basis of financial information prepared in accordance with accounting methods, or a fair valuation or other method, reasonable in the circumstances. No liability under section 10-19.1-50 or 10-19.1-95 will accrue if the requirements of this subsection have been met.

With respect to the effect of a distribution:

In the case of a distribution made by a corporation in connection with a purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of its shares, the effect of the distribution must be measured as of the date on which money or other property is transferred, or indebtedness payable in installments or otherwise is incurred, by the corporation, or as of the date on which the shareholder ceases to be a shareholder of the corporation with respect to the shares, whichever is the earliest.

The effect of any other distribution must be measured as of the date of its authorization if payment occurs one hundred twenty days or less following the date of authorization, or as of the date of payment if payment occurs more than one hundred twenty days following the date of authorization.

The provisions of chapter 13-02.1 do not apply to distributions made by a corporation governed by this chapter.

Indebtedness of a corporation incurred or issued in a distribution in accordance with this section to a shareholder who as a result of the transaction is no longer a shareholder is on a parity with the indebtedness of the corporation to its general unsecured creditors, except to the extent subordinated, agreed to, or secured by a pledge of any assets of the corporation or a related organization, or subject to any other agreement between the corporation and the shareholder.

A distribution may be made to the holders of a class or series of shares only if:

All amounts payable to the holders of shares having a preference for the payment of that kind of distribution are paid; and

The payment of the distribution does not reduce the remaining net assets of the corporation below the aggregate preferential amount payable in the event of liquidation to the holders of shares having preferential rights, unless:

The distribution is made to those shareholders in the order and to the extent of their respective priorities; or

The holders of shares who do not receive distributions in that order give notice to the corporation of their agreement to waive their right to that distribution.

A determination that the payment of the distribution described in subsection 5 does not reduce the remaining net assets of the corporation below the aggregate preferential amount payable in the event of liquidation to the holders of shares having preferential rights is presumed to be proper if the determination is made in compliance with the standard of conduct provided in section 10-19.1-50 on the basis of financial information prepared in accordance with accounting methods, a fair valuation, or other methods reasonable in the circumstances. Liability under section 10-19.1-50 or 10-19.1-94 will not arise if the requirements of this subsection are met.

If the money or property available for distribution is insufficient to satisfy all preferences, the distributions shall be made pro rata according to the order of priority of preferences by classes and by series within those classes.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1987, ch. 73, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 34; 1997, ch. 103, § 55.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-44, 10-19-45.

10-19.1-93.
Power to acquire shares.

A corporation may acquire its own shares, subject to section 10-19.1-92.

If a corporation acquires its own shares, then any of the acquired shares that are not pledged by the corporation as security for the future payment of some or all of the purchase price for the shares constitute authorized but unissued shares of the corporation, unless the articles provide that they may not be reissued. If the articles prohibit reissue, the number of authorized shares is reduced by the number of shares acquired.

If a corporation pledges acquired shares as security for future payment of all or part of the purchase price for the shares and reissues the pledged shares in its own name, then:

The shares must continue to be issued and outstanding except for voting and determination of a quorum, and the shares are not considered to be present and entitled to vote at any meeting of shareholders;

The corporation may not vote or exercise any other rights of a shareholder with respect to the pledged shares, but the pledgee shall have any rights, other than the right to vote, with respect to the shares which the pledgee is entitled to by contract;

If the pledge is foreclosed, the corporation shall reissue and deliver the pledged shares to or at the direction of the pledgee; and

Shares that are released from a pledge have the status specified in subdivision a.

If the number of authorized shares of a corporation is reduced by an acquisition of its shares, the corporation shall, no later than the time it makes its next annual report to shareholders or, if no report is made, no later than three months after the end of the fiscal year in which the acquisition occurs, file with the secretary of state a statement of cancellation showing the reduction in the authorized shares. The statement must contain:

The name of the corporation;

The number of acquired shares canceled, itemized by classes and series; and

The aggregate number of authorized shares itemized by classes and series, after giving effect to the cancellation.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 37; 1995, ch. 103, § 35; 2007, ch. 101, § 21.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-05, 10-19-68, 10-19-69.

10-19.1-94.
Liability of shareholders for illegal distributions.

A shareholder who knows or should have known that a distribution was made in violation of section 10-19.1-92 is liable to the corporation, its receiver or other person winding up its affairs, or a director under subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-95 but only to the extent that the distribution received by the shareholder exceeded the amount that properly could have been paid under section 10-19.1-92.

An action may not be commenced under this section more than two years from the date of the distribution.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-47.

Law Reviews.

Registration and Operation of North Dakota and Minnesota Limited Liability Partnerships, 72 N.D. L. Rev. 555 (1996).

10-19.1-95.
Liability of directors for illegal distributions.

In addition to any other liabilities, a director who is present and votes for or fails to vote against, except a director who is prohibited by section 10-19.1-51 from voting on the distribution, or consents in writing to, a distribution made in violation of subsection 1 or 5 of section 10-19.1-92 or a restriction contained in the articles or bylaws or an agreement, and who fails to comply with the standard of conduct provided in section 10-19.1-50, is liable to the corporation, its receiver or any other person winding up its affairs, jointly and severally with all other directors so liable and to other directors under subsection 3, but only to the extent that the distribution exceeded the amount that properly could have been paid under section 10-19.1-92.

A director against whom an action is brought under this section with respect to a distribution may implead in that action all shareholders who received the distribution and may compel pro rata contribution from them in that action to the extent provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-94.

A director against whom an action is brought under this section with respect to a distribution may implead in that action all other directors who voted for or consented in writing to the distribution and who failed to comply with the standard of conduct provided in section 10-19.1-50, and may compel pro rata contribution from them in that action.

An action may not be commenced under this section more than two years from the date of the distribution.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 36; 1997, ch. 103, § 56.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-47.

Cross-References.

Liability of officers of domestic insurance company, see N.D.C.C. § 26.1-05-22.

Liability of subscribers and shareholders, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-69.

10-19.1-96.
Merger — Exchange — Transfer.

With or without a business purpose, a corporation may merge with another domestic or foreign organization under a plan of merger approved in the manner provided in this section and in sections 10-19.1-97 through 10-19.1-103 and in the manner provided in the governing statute of the other organization.

With respect to an exchange:

A corporation may acquire all the ownership interests of one or more classes or series of another domestic or foreign organization under a plan of exchange approved in the manner provided in this section and in sections 10-19.1-97 through 10-19.1-103 in the case of a domestic corporation and in the manner provided in the governing statute in the case of any other organization.

Another domestic or foreign organization may acquire all the shares of one or more classes or series of a corporation under a plan of exchange approved in the manner provided in this section and in sections 10-19.1-97 through 10-19.1-103 in the case of a domestic corporation and in the manner provided in the governing statute in the case of any other organization.

A corporation may sell, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the corporation’s property and assets in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-104.

A corporation may participate in a merger or exchange only as permitted by this section and by sections 10-19.1-97 through 10-19.1-103. The dissenter’s rights for shareholders of a corporation are governed by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 38; 1999, ch. 95, § 27; 2007, ch. 101, § 22.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-20-01, 10-20-02.

Cross-References.

Banking associations, consolidation or merger, see N.D.C.C. § 6-03-11.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of FDIC prohibition of golden parachute payments, 12 U.S.C. § 1828(k)(1), 79 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 409.

“Golden parachute” defense to hostile corporate takeover, 66 A.L.R.4th 138.

Lockup option defense to hostile corporate takeover, 66 A.L.R.4th 180.

10-19.1-97.
Plan of merger or exchange.

A plan of merger or exchange must contain:

The name of the corporation and of each other constituent organization proposing to merge or participate in an exchange and:

In the case of a merger, the name of the surviving organization; or

In the case of an exchange, the name of the acquiring organization;

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger or exchange;

The manner and basis for converting or exchanging ownership interests:

In the case of a merger, the manner and basis of converting the ownership interests of the constituent organizations into securities of the surviving organization or of any other organization or, in whole or in part, into money or other property; or

In the case of an exchange, the manner and basis of exchanging the ownership interests to be acquired for securities of the acquiring organization or any other organization or, in whole or in part, into money or other property;

In the case of a merger, a statement of any amendments to the originating records of the surviving organization proposed as part of the merger; and

Any other provisions with respect to the proposed merger or exchange which are deemed necessary or desirable.

This section does not limit the power of a corporation to acquire all or part of the ownership interests of one or more classes or series of any other organization through a negotiated agreement with the owners or otherwise.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 39; 1999, ch. 95, § 28; 2007, ch. 101, § 23.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-20-01, 10-20-02.

Collateral References.

Liability of successor corporation for punitive damages for injury caused by predecessor’s product, 55 A.L.R.4th 166.

Propriety of applying minority discount of value of shares purchased by corporation or its shareholders from minority shareholders, 13 A.L.R.5th 840.

10-19.1-98.
Plan approval.

A resolution containing the plan of merger or exchange must be approved by the governing body as required by section 10-19.1-46 in the case of a domestic corporation, or by the governing statute of each other constituent organization and must then be submitted at a regular or special meeting to the owners of each constituent organization, in the case of a plan of merger or the constituent organization whose ownership interests will be acquired by the acquiring constituent organization in the exchange, in the case of a plan of exchange. If owners owning any class or series of ownership interests in a constituent organization are entitled to vote on the plan of merger or exchange under this subsection, then written notice must be given to every owner of that constituent organization, whether or not entitled to vote at the meeting, not less than fourteen days nor more than sixty days before the meeting, in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-73 for notice of meetings of shareholders in the case of a domestic corporation, or in the manner provided in its governing statute in the case of each other constituent organization. The written notice must state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider the proposed plan of merger or exchange. A copy or short description of the plan of merger or exchange must be included in or enclosed with the notice.

At the meeting a vote of the owners must be taken on the proposed plan. The plan of merger or exchange is adopted when approved by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the voting power of all ownership interests entitled to vote. Except as provided in subsection 3, a class or series of ownership interests of the constituent organization is entitled to vote as a class or series if any provision of the plan would, if contained in a proposed amendment to the articles, or a member-control agreement, entitle the class or series of ownership interests to vote as a class or series and, in the case of an exchange, if the class or series is included in the exchange.

A class or series of ownership interests of the constituent organization is not entitled to vote as a class or series if the plan of merger or exchange affects a cancellation or exchange of all ownership interests of the constituent organization of all classes and series that are outstanding immediately before the merger or exchange and owners of ownership interests of that class or series are entitled to obtain payment for the fair value of their ownership interests under section 10-19.1-87, or would have the right to obtain payment for their ownership interests absent the exception set forth in subsection 6 of section 10-19.1-87, in the case of a domestic corporation, or under its governing statute in the case of any other organization in the event of the merger or exchange.

Notwithstanding subsections 1 and 2, submission of a plan of merger or exchange to a vote at a meeting of owners of a surviving constituent organization is not required if:

The articles will not be amended in the transaction;

Each owner of ownership interests in the constituent organization which were outstanding immediately before the effective date of the transaction will hold the same number of ownership interests with identical rights immediately after the effective date;

The voting power of the outstanding ownership interests of the constituent organization entitled to vote immediately after the merger or exchange, plus the voting power of the ownership interests of the constituent organization entitled to vote issuable on conversion of, or on the exercise of rights to purchase, securities issued in the transaction, will not exceed by more than twenty percent the voting power of the outstanding ownership interests of the constituent organization entitled to vote immediately before the transaction; and

The number of participating ownership interests of the constituent organization immediately after the merger, plus the number of participating ownership interests of the constituent organization issuable on conversion of, or on the exercise of rights to purchase, securities issued in the merger, will not exceed by more than twenty percent the number of participating ownership interests of the constituent organization immediately before the merger. “Participating ownership interests” are outstanding ownership interests of the constituent organization which entitle their owners to participate without limitation in distributions by the constituent organization.

If the merger or exchange is with an organization other than a domestic corporation, the plan of merger or exchange must also be approved in the manner provided in the governing statute of the other organization.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 40; 1995, ch. 103, § 37; 1999, ch. 95, § 29; 2001, ch. 112, § 11; 2007, ch. 101, § 24.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-20-03.